Wyoming, session 2025, SF0039.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-104.1 is created to read:
31-2-104.1. Transfer of title upon death; beneficiary
designation forms; definitions.
(a) Each county clerk shall make available a
beneficiary designation form that allows the owner or
owners of a vehicle to arrange for the transfer of the
vehicle's title to a named beneficiary upon the death of
the owner or upon the death of all owners of the vehicle.
The form shall include fields for the following
information:
(i) The manufacturer, model, year and vehicle
identification number of the vehicle;
(ii) The name of all owners of the vehicle;
(iii) The words "transfer on death to" followed
by the name of the beneficiary; and
(iv) The notarized signature of all owners of
the vehicle.
(b) The form shall be recorded in the office of the
county clerk in the county where the vehicle is titled.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) Upon the death of the owner, or of the last
surviving owner, of a vehicle for which a beneficiary
designation form has been properly executed and recorded,
as described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section,
the beneficiary shall present the recorded form or a copy
of the form to the county clerk and request a new
certificate of title in the beneficiary's name. The
beneficiary shall also present to the county clerk:
(i) A certified copy of the death certificate of
the vehicle's owner or the last surviving owner of the
vehicle; and
(ii) The fee for an application for a
certificate of title required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii).
(d) Upon the presentation of a properly executed
beneficiary designation form, submittal of the certified
copy of a death certificate and payment of the certificate
of title application fee, as described in subsection (c) of
this section, the county clerk, subject to any liens and
security interest, shall issue a new certificate of title
to the beneficiary.
(e) The estate of a deceased vehicle owner is not
liable for obtaining a new certificate of title or for
transferring title to the vehicle pursuant to a beneficiary
designation form if the personal representative does not
have actual knowledge of the existence of a valid,
unrevoked beneficiary designation form.
(f) A successor of a decedent, or a person acting on
behalf of a successor, is not liable for obtaining a new
certificate of title or transferring title to a vehicle
subject to a beneficiary designation form if the person
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
does not have actual knowledge of the existence of a valid,
unrevoked beneficiary designation form.
(g) During the lifetime of the owner of a vehicle for
which a beneficiary designation form has been properly
executed or before the death of the last surviving owner of
such a vehicle:
(i) The signature or consent of the beneficiary
is not required for any transaction relating to the
vehicle; and
(ii) The owner or owners of the vehicle may
revoke the beneficiary designation form or change the
beneficiary of the beneficiary designation form at any time
by:
(A) Transferring ownership of the vehicle
with proper assignment and delivery of the certificate of
title to another person; or
(B) Properly executing a subsequent
beneficiary designation form that designates a new
beneficiary.
(h) Upon the death of the owner of a vehicle or upon
the death of the last surviving owner of a vehicle for
which a beneficiary designation form has been properly
executed, the interest of the beneficiary in the vehicle is
subject to any contract of sale, assignment, lien,
ownership or security interest to which the deceased owner
or owners were subject.
(j) Except as provided in paragraph (g)(ii) of this
section, the designation of a beneficiary in a beneficiary
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
designation form may not be changed or revoked by will or
by any other instrument or by a change in circumstances.
(k) The transfer of a vehicle pursuant to this
section is a nonprobate transfer pursuant to the Wyoming
Probate Code.
(m) As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(i) "Beneficiary" means one or more specifically
named persons or entities designated to receive title to a
vehicle upon the death of the preceding owner;
(ii) "Beneficiary designation form" means a form
that indicates the intention of a present owner or owners
of a vehicle to transfer ownership of the vehicle to a
named beneficiary upon the death of the owner or last
surviving owner of the vehicle.
Section 2. W.S. 2-18-103(a) and by creating a new
subsection (p), 31-1-201(d) and 31-2-104(a) and (c) are
amended to read:
2-18-103. Transfer on death deed or title.
(a) A deed or title that conveys an interest in real
or titled property, including any debt secured by a lien on
the real or titled property, to a grantee beneficiary
designated by the owner and that expressly states that the
deed or title is effective on the death of the owner
transfers the deceased owner's interest to the grantee
beneficiary designated by name in the transfer on death
deed or title effective on the death of the owner, subject
to all conveyances, assignments, contracts, mortgages,
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
deeds of trust, liens, security pledges, and other
encumbrances made by the owner or to which the owner was
subject during the owner's lifetime. The grantee
beneficiary also takes title subject to any interest in the
property of which the grantee beneficiary has either actual
or constructive notice.
(p) Title to the interest in a vehicle transferred by
a transfer on death title shall vest in the designated
grantee beneficiary only on the death of the owner.
31-1-201. General administrative procedures.
(d) The department shall prescribe and provide
suitable forms of applications, registration cards and all
other forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this
act subject to the requirements of this act and shall
promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the
provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the fee and
taxation provisions of this act. The department shall
promulgate rules and regulations permitting any person
aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the
department including the payment of any fees and taxes to
appeal to the office of administrative hearings pursuant to
W.S. 9-2-2202. The department shall provide, at cost,
suitable certificate of title forms and beneficiary
designation forms to county clerks.
31-2-104. Transfer of ownership.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and
W.S. 31-2-104.1, the owner of a vehicle who sells or
transfers his interest in a vehicle for which a certificate
of title has been issued shall endorse an assignment and
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
warranty of title upon the certificate for the vehicle with
a statement of all liens and encumbrances thereon, which
assignment, warranty and statement shall be signed and
dated by the owner before a notarial officer and
acknowledged thereby in the manner provided by law, to be
dated and delivered to the transferee at the time of
delivering the vehicle. Except as provided in subsection
(b) of this section, the transferee shall present the
certificate to a county clerk and apply for a new
certificate of title within the same time periods as
required by W.S. 31-2-201(a)(ii).
(c) Except as provided by W.S. 31-2-104.1 in the
event of a transfer by operation of law of any interest in
a vehicle as upon an order in bankruptcy or insolvency,
execution sale, repossession upon default in the
performance of the terms of a lease or sales contract or
otherwise than by voluntary act of the person whose title
or interest is transferred, the administrator, receiver,
trustee, sheriff, creditor or other representative or
successor in interest of the person whose interest is
transferred shall forward to the county clerk an
application for a certificate of title together with a
verified or certified statement of the transfer of
interest. The statement shall set forth the reason for the
involuntary transfer, the interest transferred, the name of
the transferee, the process or procedure effecting the
transfer and other information requested by the county
clerk. Evidence and instruments otherwise required by law
to effect a transfer of legal or equitable title to or an
interest in a vehicle in such cases shall be furnished with
the statement. If a transfer of title to a creditor is
accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection, a creditor retains the right to seek any
deficiency balance which may exist after sale, provided the
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
creditor has complied with all applicable law, and the
transfer by itself shall not be considered a strict
foreclosure or an election to retain the collateral in
satisfaction of an obligation as provided by W.S.
34.1-9-620 and does not affect the debtor's right to redeem
the collateral under W.S. 34.1-9-623. If from the records
of the county clerk there appears to be any lien on the
vehicle which was recorded prior to the lien of the
creditor applying for title and which has not been
released, the certificate of title shall contain a
statement of the lien. The creditor repossessing and
applying for title to the vehicle shall notify all persons
holding liens on the vehicle by certified mail return
receipt requested at least fifteen (15) days prior to
filing the application for title. Any proceeds from the
sale, lease or other disposition of the vehicle shall be
distributed in accordance with the provisions of W.S.
34.1-9-608.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
promulgate any rules necessary to implement this act.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8